Colorado, session 2026A, SB058.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration.
(1) The general assembly finds and declares that:
(a) Colorado's automatic voter registration (AVR) program has
successfully registered hundreds of thousands of new voters through the
department of revenue and other voter registration agencies;
(b) Currently, an elector whose voter registration is initiated
through AVR is by default registered, or preregistered, as "unaffiliated",
without the elector's declaration of affiliation or self-affirmation of
-2- SB26-058

qualifications;
(c) Many electors incorrectly believe that the state has actively
identified them as "unaffiliated" voters and express confusion, frustration,
and distrust regarding this default classification while working with their
county clerk and recorder to change their voter registration records;
(d) The AVR system's "unaffiliated" default also creates an
administrative burden for county clerks and recorders who assist electors
in correcting the elector's affiliation on their voter registration records;
(e) Establishing a pending voter registration status in the AVR
system clarifies that further action and affirmative elector input is
required to complete their voter registration record, including declaration
of party affiliation or identification as unaffiliated; and
(f) Modifying AVR to clearly identify and properly process
pending voter registration records increases system transparency, builds
trust with participants, improves the accuracy of voter registration
records, and gives county clerks and recorders direction for further
outreach to potential voters.
(2) The general assembly further finds and declares that:
(a) There are over one hundred thousands electors in Colorado
with "active" voter registration records but who have not voted in at least
two consecutive general elections held in even-numbered years; and
(b) Changing the status of these electors to "inactive" is a
cost-saving measure that will save taxpayers millions of dollars in
election-related expenses.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-2-213.3, amend
(1)(b), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), and (8) as follows:
1-2-213.3. Transfer of new voter registration records from
-3- SB26-058

department of revenue.
(1) (b) The department of revenue shall continue to offer any
person not registered PENDING REGISTRATION to vote pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section an opportunity to register to vote pursuant
to section 1-2-213, unless they have provided documentation
demonstrating a lack of United States citizenship.
(2) Upon receiving an electronic record for an individual A
PERSON who provided documentation that confirmed his or her THEIR
citizenship and contains the minimum information to PROCEED TO register
OR PREREGISTER the individual PERSON to vote, the secretary of state shall
provide the PENDING VOTER REGISTRATION information to the county
clerk and recorder of the county in which the person resides. Upon receipt
of a PENDING VOTER REGISTRATION record, the county clerk and recorder
shall determine if the record is complete for the purposes of FINALIZING
THE PENDING voter registration OR PREREGISTRATION.
(3) If the record is complete for purposes of FINALIZING PENDING
voter registration or preregistration, the county clerk and recorder shall
send to the person's address of record, by nonforwardable mail:
(a) If the record is for an eligible elector, notice that the elector
has been registered to vote VOTER REGISTRATION IS PENDING and a
postage paid pre-addressed return form by which the elector PERSON may:
(I) Decline to be registered as an elector; or
(II) Affiliate with a political party OR IDENTIFY AS UNAFFILIATED
WITH ANY POLITICAL PARTY AND SIGN A SELF-AFFIRMATION IN THE FORM
REQUIRED BY SECTION 1-2-205; and
(b) If the record is for a person eligible to preregister under
section 1-2-101 (2), notice that the person has been preregistered and will
-4- SB26-058

be automatically registered PREREGISTRATION AND AUTOMATIC
REGISTRATION upon turning eighteen years of age OLD IS PENDING, and a
postage paid preaddressed return form by which the person may:
(I) Decline to be preregistered OR AUTOMATICALLY REGISTERED;
or
(II) Affiliate with a political party OR IDENTIFY AS UNAFFILIATED
WITH ANY POLITICAL PARTY AND SIGN A SELF-AFFIRMATION IN THE FORM
REQUIRED BY SECTION 1-2-205.
(4) If the record is not complete FOR PURPOSES OF FINALIZING
PENDING VOTER REGISTRATION OR PREREGISTRATION, the county clerk and
recorder shall send to the person's address of record, by nonforwardable
mail, notice that the person has not been registered or preregistered to
vote and stating the additional information required to register or
preregister, INCLUDING ANY INFORMATION REQUIRED BY SECTION 1-2-204
AND A SIGNED SELF-AFFIRMATION IN THE FORM REQUIRED BY SECTION
1-2-205. If the person provides the additional information, the person is
registered or preregistered to vote effective as of the date of the person's
application with the department of revenue. If the person does not provide
the additional information necessary to make his or her application THE
PENDING VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION complete and accurate
within twenty-four months after the notification is mailed pursuant to this
subsection (4), the person's PENDING registration OR PREREGISTRATION
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION is canceled.
(5) A notice mailed under subsection (3) OR (4) of this section
must include an explanation, in both English and Spanish, of the
eligibility requirements to register or preregister to vote, and a statement
that, if the person is not eligible, the person should decline to register OR
-5- SB26-058

PREREGISTER using the preaddressed return form.
(6) The notice provided under subsection (3) OR (4) of this section
must include a statement that, if the person declines to register or
preregister to vote, the fact that the person has declined will remain
confidential and will be used only for voter registration statistics
purposes, and a statement that, if a person remains IS registered or
preregistered to vote, the office at which the person was registered or
preregistered will remain confidential and will be used only for voter
registration statistics purposes.
(7) (a) (I) If a notice provided under subsections (3) and OR (4) of
this section is returned as undeliverable within twenty days after the
county clerk and recorder mails the notice, the person's PENDING
registration or preregistration is canceled and the person is deemed to
have never registered or preregistered. If the notice is returned as
undeliverable after twenty days after the county clerk and recorder mails
the notice, the person's PENDING registration or preregistration is marked
inactive.
(II) Notwithstanding subsection (7)(a)(I) of this section, if a
person votes in an election after the transfer of the person's record
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION but before the notice is
returned as undeliverable, the person's PENDING registration shall not be
canceled or marked inactive.
(b) If a notice provided under subsection (3) of this section is not
returned within twenty days, the person is registered or preregistered as
of the date of the person's application at the department of revenue and
the person shall be marked as unaffiliated PERSON'S PENDING
REGISTRATION OR PREREGISTRATION IS MARKED INACTIVE. THE COUNTY
-6- SB26-058

CLERK AND RECORDER MAY, IN THEIR DISCRETION, PROVIDE NOTICE OF
INACTIVE PENDING REGISTRATION OR PREREGISTRATION STATUS AND MAY
PURSUE FINALIZATION OF SUCH PENDING REGISTRATION OR
PREREGISTRATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(c) If a person returns the form provided under subsection (3) of
this section and declines to be registered or preregistered, including if the
person returns the form and both declines to be registered or preregistered
and also affiliates with a party, the person's PENDING registration or
preregistration is canceled and the person is deemed to have never
registered or preregistered; except that, if the person has voted VOTES in
an election, the return form is of no effect and the person remains IS
registered as of the date of the person's application with the department
of revenue.
(d) If a person returns the form provided under subsection (3) of
this section and affiliates with a party OR IDENTIFIES AS UNAFFILIATED
AND PROVIDES THE REQUIRED SELF-AFFIRMATION, the person is registered
or preregistered as of the date of the person's application with the
department of revenue and the person's affiliation shall be marked
effective as of the date the affiliation information was received.
(e) If a person returns the form without marking either the option
to decline or the option to affiliate with a party the returned form is of no
effect. The person is registered or preregistered as of the date of the
person's application with the department of revenue and shall be marked
as unaffiliated OR IDENTIFY AS UNAFFILIATED, THE PERSON'S PENDING
REGISTRATION OR PREREGISTRATION IS MARKED INACTIVE. THE COUNTY
CLERK AND RECORDER MAY, IN THEIR DISCRETION, PROVIDE NOTICE OF
INACTIVE PENDING REGISTRATION OR PREREGISTRATION STATUS AND MAY
-7- SB26-058

PURSUE FINALIZATION OF SUCH PENDING REGISTRATION OR
PREREGISTRATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(8) After the twenty-day period described in subsection (7) of this
section passes, The registration information of a person registered OR
PREREGISTERED pursuant to this section, including the fact that the person
was registered through a voter registration agency, becomes a registration
record that must be maintained and made available for public inspection
in accordance with section 1-2-227. Information relating to the return of
a notice form by a person declining to be registered or preregistered and
information relating to the specific agency at which a person was
registered pursuant to this section is not a public record subject to public
inspection and shall not be used for any purpose other than voter
registration statistics.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-2-605, add (1.5)
as follows:
1-2-605. Canceling registration - procedures.
(1.5) IF AN ACTIVE ELECTOR FAILS TO VOTE IN AT LEAST ONE
ELECTION CONDUCTED BY A COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER DURING A
TIME PERIOD THAT INCLUDES TWO CONSECUTIVE GENERAL ELECTIONS
HELD IN EVEN-NUMBERED YEARS, THEN THE COUNTY CLERK AND
RECORDER SHALL MARK THE ELECTOR'S REGISTRATION RECORD
"INACTIVE" AND MAIL THE ELECTOR A CONFIRMATION CARD BY WHICH THE
ELECTOR MAY VERIFY THEIR STATUS AS AN ACTIVE ELECTOR IN THE
COUNTY. IF THE ELECTOR VERIFIES THEIR STATUS AS AN ACTIVE ELECTOR
IN THE COUNTY, THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER SHALL MARK THE
ELECTOR'S REGISTRATION RECORD "ACTIVE". IF AN ELECTOR'S
CONFIRMATION CARD IS RETURNED BY THE UNITED STATES POSTAL
-8- SB26-058

SERVICE AS UNDELIVERABLE, THE COUNTY CLERK AND RECORDER SHALL
PROCEED WITH ADDRESS VERIFICATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(5) OF THIS SECTION. IF THE ELECTOR FAILS TO RESPOND, THE COUNTY
CLERK AND RECORDER SHALL LEAVE THE REGISTRATION RECORD OF THAT
ELECTOR MARKED "INACTIVE".
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-9- SB26-058